Colorado statutes. TITLE 2 Legislative
PART 1
CONSTRUCTION OF WORDS AND PHRASES

2-4-101. Common and technical usage.

Words and phrases shall be read in context and construed according to the rules of grammar and common usage. Words and phrases that have acquired a technical or particular meaning, whether by legislative definition or otherwise, shall be construed accordingly.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1422, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 135-1-101.

2-4-102. Singular and plural.

The singular includes the plural, and the plural includes the singular.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1422, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 135-1-102.

2-4-103. Gender.

Every word importing the masculine gender only may extend to and be applied to females and things as well as males; every word importing the feminine gender only may extend to and be applied to males and things as well as females; and every word importing the neuter gender only may extend to and be applied to natural persons as well as things.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1422, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 135-1-103.

2-4-104. Tense.

Words in the present tense include the future tense.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1422, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 135-1-104.

2-4-105. Week.

The word "week" means any seven consecutive days.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1422, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 135-1-105.

2-4-106. Month.

The word "month" means a calendar month.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1423, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 135-1-106.

2-4-107. Year.

The word "year" means a calendar year.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1423, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 135-1-107.

2-4-108. Computation of time.

In computing a period of days, the first day is excluded and the last day is included.

If the last day of any period is a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday, the period is extended to include the next day which is not a Saturday, Sunday, or legal holiday.

If a number of months is to be computed by counting the months from a particular day, the period ends on the same numerical day in the concluding month as the day of the month from which the computation is begun, unless there are not that many days in the concluding month, in which case the period ends on the last day of that month.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1423, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 135-1-108.

Cross references:

For provisions governing publication of legal notices and advertisements and the computation of time therefor, see part 1 of article 70 of title 24; for computation of time under the "Uniform Election Code of 1992", articles 1 to 13 of title 1, see § 1-1-106.

2-4-109. Standard time - daylight saving time - definition - repeal.

The standard time within the state, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, is that which is now known and designated by act of congress as "United States Mountain Standard Time".

This subsection (1) is repealed, effective on the date subsection (2.5) of this section takes effect.

From two o'clock antemeridian on the second Sunday of March, until two o'clock antemeridian on the first Sunday of November, or such other times and days as may, from time to time, be designated by act of congress, the standard time in this state so established shall be one hour in advance of the standard time now known as "United States Mountain Standard Time".

This subsection (2) is repealed, effective on the date subsection (2.5) of this section takes effect.

(2.5) (a) The standard time within the state throughout the year is coordinated universal time minus six hours. As used in this section, "coordinated universal time" means the time scale maintained through the general conference of weights and measures and interpreted or modified for the United States by the secretary of commerce in coordination with the secretary of the Navy.

This subsection (2.5) takes effect at two o'clock antemeridian on the first Sunday of November after the governor notifies the revisor of statutes that the following conditions have occurred:

A federal law is enacted and takes effect that authorizes states to adopt coordinated universal time minus six hours, commonly known as "United States Mountain Daylight Saving Time", as the standard time for the state throughout the year; and

At least four states in the mountain standard time zone, in addition to Colorado, enact legislation that becomes law making coordinated universal time minus six hours, commonly known as "United States Mountain Daylight Saving Time", the states' standard time throughout the year.

The governor shall notify the revisor of statutes in writing of the date on which the conditions specified in subsection (2.5)(b)(I) of this section have occurred by e-mailing the notice to revisorofstatutes.ga@state.co.us.

For purposes of this subsection (2.5)(b), the mountain standard time zone includes Arizona, New Mexico, Colorado, Utah, Wyoming, Montana, and the southern portion of Idaho as described in 15 U.S.C. sec. 264.

In all laws, statutes, orders, decrees, rules, and regulations relating to the time of performance of any act by any officer or department of this state, or of any county, city and county, city, town, district, or other political subdivision thereof, or relating to the time in which any rights shall accrue or determine, or within which any act shall or shall not be performed by any person subject to the jurisdiction of the state, and in all the public schools and in all other institutions of this state, or of any county, city and county, city, town, or district thereof, and in all contracts or choses in action made or to be performed in this state, the time shall be as set forth in this section and it shall be so understood and intended.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1423, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 135-1-109.

L. 87:

(2) amended, p. 1574, § 2, effective July 10.

L. 2007:

(2) amended, p. 2018, § 4, effective June 1.

L. 2022:

(1) and (2) amended and (2.5) added, (HB 22-1297), ch. 330, p. 2321, § 2, effective August 10.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1297, see section 1 of chapter 330, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

2-4-110. Joint authority.

A grant of authority to three or more persons as a public body confers the authority upon a majority of the number of members fixed by statute.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1423, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 135-1-110.

2-4-111. Quorum.

A quorum of a public body is a majority of the number of members fixed by statute.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1423, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 135-1-111.

2-4-112. Conflict in the expression of numbers.

If there is a conflict between figures and words in expressing a number, the words govern.

Source:

L. 73:

R&RE, p. 1423, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 135-1-112.

2-4-113. Use of "to" in reference to several sections.

Wherever in the statutes of this state a reference is made to several sections and the section numbers given in the reference are connected by the word "to", the reference includes both sections whose numbers are given and all intervening sections.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire section added, p. 205, § 1, effective July 16.

2-4-114. Introductory portion.

The portion of any section, subsection, paragraph, or subparagraph which precedes a list of examples, requirements, conditions, or other items may be referred to and cited as the "introductory portion" to the section, subsection, paragraph, or subparagraph.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire section added, p. 205, § 1, effective July 16.